Utah statutes.
36-23-109.   Review of state regulation of occupations and professions.

Before the annual written report described in Section 36-23-107 is submitted for 2013, the committee shall study potentially less restrictive alternatives to licensing for the regulation of occupations and professions, including registration and certification if appropriate, that would better avoid unnecessary regulation and intrusion upon individual liberties by the state, while still protecting the health and safety of the public.



Enacted by Chapter 323, 2013 General Session

